Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5424
Certificates; renewal; fee.

Certificates granted under the Utilization Review Act may be renewed prior to their expiration date upon the filing of the following with the department (1) a renewal fee of one hundred dollars, (2) a statement detailing any changes in the information or documentation filed with the initial application, and (3) such other reasonable information as the department requires for enforcement of the act.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5414;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 9.